Hawaii statutes.
[§463E-14] Discrimination prohibited.
No department, office, or agency of the state or county government, or any
subdivision thereof, or any clinic, medical service, insurance carrier, or any
board administering relief or foundations under the law of the State shall deny
to the recipient or beneficiary of podiatric aid or services the freedom to
choose podiatric care or services which are within the scope of activities of a
podiatrist licensed under this chapter. [L 1973, c 80, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next